District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.05

Exemptions; federal services.

Any person who is providing occupational or professional services for the federal government at a federal government facility in the District shall not be regulated under this subchapter. Any person who has a license or certificate issued by the federal government permitting that person to provide particular occupational or professional services may provide such services in the District of Columbia without obtaining a District license or certificate as long as the services provided by that person are within the scope of the federal license or certificate.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.5.